Hawaii, session 2026, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 141, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§141-     Aquatic livestock import evaluation and authorization process; rules.  The division of animal industry may adopt, amend, and repeal rules consistent with applicable law, to develop a science-based evaluation and authorization process to import and transport aquatic livestock within the State.  This process shall: (1)  Be based on the biological aquatic risk-based framework developed and maintained by the department pursuant to this chapter and chapter 142; (2)  Include mandatory pre-arrival disease testing, entry point inspection, and post-arrival monitoring and inspection; and (3)  Require mandatory quarantine, remediation, or depopulation of any aquatic animals determined to pose a biological aquatic risk." SECTION 2.  Section 141-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding three new definitions to be appropriately inserted and to read as follows: ""Aquatic livestock" means species of domesticated or non-native fish, crustaceans, and mollusks that are propagated and raised for food or similar human food production, ecological restoration, or similar commercial purposes. "Biocontainment" means the operational methods, procedures, physical facility features, and containment or safety equipment or the designs thereof, used for managing infectious or potentially hazardous materials and animals in an aquatic livestock facility or environment in which these materials and animals are potentially handled or maintained.  "Biocontainment" includes measures to prevent the release of infectious animal species and associated pathogens into the natural environment. "Biological aquatic risk" means the combination of the consequences of an event, the probability of an adverse biological event, and the magnitude of its potential consequences, where biological material constitutes the source of harm, whether from an escaped aquatic livestock species or associated pathogens or disease." SECTION 3.  Section 141-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) There is established within the department an aquaculture program that shall: (1)  Monitor actions taken by industry and by federal, state, county, and private agencies in activities relating to aquaculture, and promote and support worthwhile aquaculture activities; (2)  Serve as an information clearinghouse for aquaculture activities; (3)  Coordinate development projects to investigate and solve biological and technical problems involved in raising selected species with commercial potential; (4)  Actively seek federal funding for aquaculture activities; (5)  Undertake activities required to develop and expand the aquaculture industry[; and], which shall include: (A)  Developing a biological aquatic risk-based framework for the evaluation and authorization process for aquatic livestock that categorizes aquatic livestock species based on the probability and consequence of the establishment of a self-sustaining feral or invasive population; and (B)  Developing biocontainment standards that establish minimum physical design and operational performance requirements for aquatic livestock facilities; and (6)  Perform other functions and activities that may be assigned by law." SECTION 4.  Section 161-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§161-6  Division of animal industry.  The division of animal industry of the department of agriculture and biosecurity shall administer this chapter subject to the supervision of the board.  The board may delegate any of its powers under this chapter, except the power to make rules and regulations[,] other than rules pursuant to section 141-   , or may direct any of its duties to be performed by any appropriate agents, officers, or employees of the board. The board may employ on a full or part-time basis veterinarians and poultry inspectors, subject to chapter 76, to carry out a uniform inspection system of poultry or poultry products throughout the State.  All poultry inspectors shall be under the supervision and control of a veterinarian employed by the board." SECTION 5. (a)  The division of animal industry shall develop a biological aquatic risk-based framework for the evaluation and authorization process to import and transport aquatic livestock within the State.  In developing the framework, the division of animal industry shall consider: (1)  Relevant standards promulgated or recognized by the United States Department of Agriculture; (2)  Current aquatic livestock import policies, disease risks, and industry development issues; (3)  Best practices of the aquaculture industry, including internationally recognized biosecurity and disease management protocols; and (4)  The protection of indigenous species as defined in section 195D-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and their habitats. (b) For the purposes of this section, "biological aquatic risk" has the same meaning as defined in section 141-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 6. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.